Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202686-1039
Home service provider, defined.

Home service provider means a telecommunications company as defined in section 86-322 that has contracted with a customer to provide wireless service.

Laws 2007, LB661, § 18;

R.S.1943, (2024), § 86-449.01;

Laws 2025, LB362, § 21.